Washington statutes.
RCW 18.104.065

Remedies for noncomplying wells.

(1) The department may order a well contractor or well operator to repair, alter, or decommission a well if the department demonstrates that the construction of the well did not meet the standards for well construction in effect at the time construction of the well was completed.

(2) The department may not issue an order pursuant to this section:

(a) For wells for which construction has been substantially completed before July 1, 1993, more than six years after construction has been substantially completed; or

(b) For wells for which construction has been substantially completed on or after July 1, 1993, more than three years after construction has been substantially completed.

For purposes of this subsection, "construction has been substantially completed" has the same meaning as "substantial completion of construction" in RCW 4.16.310.

(3) Subsection (2) of this section shall only apply to a well for which the notice of construction required by RCW 18.104.048 and the report required by RCW 18.104.050 have been filed with the department.

[ 1993 c 387 s 11.]